en: Bolognese spaghetti
bg: Спагети Болонезе
de: Bolognese-Spaghetti
es: Spaghetti bolognesa
fr: spaghetti à la bolognaise
hr: Bolonjez špagete
it: Spaghetti alla bolognese
ja: スパゲッティ・アッラ・ボロネーゼ
nl: Bolognese spaghetti

en: Bolognese tagliatelle
de: Bolognese-Tagliatelle
es: Tagliatelle a la boloñesa
fr: tagliatelle à la bolognaise
hr: Bolognese tagliatelle
it: Tagliatelle alla bolognese
ja: タリアテッレ・アッラ・ボロネーゼ
nl: Bolognese tagliatelle

en: Bolognese linguine
de: Bolognese-Linguine
es: Linguine a la boloñesa
fr: Linguine à la bolognaise
hr: Bolognese linguine
it: Linguine alla bolognese
nl: Bolognese linguine
sv: Linguine bolognese

en: Frozen bolognese linguine
sv: Frysta linguine bologneser

en: Pasta with fish
bg: Паста с риба
de: Nudeln mit Fisch
es: Pasta con pescado
fr: Pâtes au poisson
hr: Tjestenina s ribom
it: Pasta al pesce
nl: Pasta met vis

en: Pasta with salmon
bg: Паста със сьомга
es: Pasta con salmón
fr: Pâtes au saumon
hr: Tjestenina s lososom
it: Pasta al salmone

en: Stuffed pastas in sauce
bg: Пълнена паста със сос
ca: Pastes farcides amb salsa
de: Gefüllte Nudeln in Sauce
es: Pastas rellenas en salsa
fi: täytetyt pastat kastikkeessa
fr: Pâtes farcies en sauce
he: פסטה ממולאת ברוטב
hr: Punjene tjestenine u umaku
hu: Töltött tészták szósszal
it: Pasta farcita in salsa
nl: Gevulde pastas in saus

en: Stuffed pastas, Cooked filled pasta
bg: Пълнена паста
ca: Pastes farcides
de: Gefüllte Nudeln
es: Pastas rellenas
fi: täytetyt pastat
fr: Pâtes farcies, Pâtes fraîches farcies cuites
he: פסטה ממולאת
hr: Punjene tjestenine
hu: Töltött tészták
it: Pasta farcita, pasta ripiena
nl: Gevulde pastas
zh: 带馅义大利面

en: Tortellini
xx: Tortellini
bg: Тортелини
de: Tortellini
es: Tortellinis
fi: tortelliini
fr: Tortellini
it: Tortellini
ja: トルテリーニ
nl: Tortellinis
pl: Uszka, Tortellini

fr: Tortellini au fromage, Tortellini fromage
de: Tortellini mit Käse
es: Tortellini de queso
it: Tortellini al formaggio
nl: Kaastortellini

fr: Tortellini aux quatre fromages, Tortellini 4 fromages
de: Tortellini mit vier Käsesorten
es: Tortellini de cuatro quesos
it: Tortellini ai quattro formaggi
nl: Tortellini met vier kazen

fr: Tortellini au poulet
de: Tortellini mit Hühnchen
es: Tortellini de pollo
it: Tortellini di pollo
nl: Tortellini met kip

en: Tortelloni
xx: Tortelloni
bg: Тортелони

en: Noodles
bg: Нудели
ca: Fideus
da: Nudler
de: Nudeln
es: Tallarines
fi: nuudelit
fr: Nouilles
he: אטריות
hr: Rezanci
it: Noodle
ja: 麺
nl: Noedels
pl: Kluski, Nudle
ru: Лапша
sv: Nudlar
zh: 面条, 面

en: Cellophane noodles, Chinese vermicelli, Bean threads, Bean thread noodles, Crystal noodles, Glass noodles
es: Fideos celofán, Fideos de cristal, Glass noodles
hr: Celofanski rezanci
nl: Glasnoedels

en: Maranta noodles, Maranta vermicelli
fr: Vermicelles de marante

en: Egg noodles
de: Eiernudeln
es: Fideos de huevo
fi: munanuudelit
fr: Nouilles aux oeufs
he: אטריות ביצים
hr: Rezanci od jaja
it: Tutti tagliatelle all'uovo
nl: Eiernoedels
pl: Makarony jajeczne
zh: 鸡蛋面

en: Egg tagliatelle
de: Eiertagliatelle
es: Tallarines de huevo
fi: munatagliatelle
fr: Tagliatelles aux œufs, tagliatelles aux œufs frais
hr: Tagliatelle od jaja
it: Tagliatelle all'uovo
nl: Eiertagliatelles

en: Egg spaghetti
de: Eierspaghettis, Eierspaghetti
es: Espaguetis de huevo
fi: Munaspagetti
fr: Spaghettis aux œufs, Spaghettis aux œufs frais
hr: Špageti od jaja
nl: Eierspaghettis

en: Rice vermicelli
bg: Оризови локши
ca: Fideus de riu
da: Risnudler
de: Reisnudeln, Reisfadennudeln
es: Vermicelli de arroz, Fideos finos de arroz
fi: riisinuudelit
fr: Vermicelle de riz, vermicelles de riz
he: אטריות אורז
hr: Rižin vermicelli
it: Vermicelli di riso
ja: 米の麺
nl: Rijstvermicellis
pl: Makaroniki ryżowe
ru: Рисовая лапша
sv: Risnudlar
zh: 米粉